Maine, session 132, LD388.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §8301-A, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Exemption from duplicative licensure. Notwithstanding any provision of this
chapter to the contrary, a child care facility or family child care provider on a military
installation or a facility licensed or certified as a family child care provider by the United
States Department of Defense or by the United States Coast Guard that provides care only
for children of parents or guardians who are active duty military members is exempt from
the requirements of this chapter.
Page 1 - 132LR1116(03)